Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-154
Discharge of lien; partial release; procedure.

(1) A lien provided by sections 52-125 to 52-159 may be discharged of record by:

(a) Recording a signed statement of the record claimant stating that the lien is released;

(b) Failing to record, within the time prescribed in the provisions on duration of lien under section 52-140, an affidavit that the total contract price is not yet due;

(c) Recording the original or certified copy of a final judgment or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction so providing; or

(d) Recording, as provided in section 52-151, a certificate of the clerk of the district court showing the deposit of substitute collateral.

(2) The lien claimant of record by partial release may reduce the amount of the lien claimed in the notice of lien or limit the notice of lien to a portion of the real estate described in the notice of commencement by recording an amendment to his or her lien showing the reduction in amount or limited portion of the real estate against which a lien is claimed.

(3) A statement under subdivision (1)(a) of this section or a judgment under subdivision (1)(c) of this section must refer by record location to the notice of lien to which it applies.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 30.